Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 8230. LUMBERTON MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8230.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "Director" means a member of the board.

(3) "District" means the Lumberton Municipal Utility District.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 8230.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a conservation and reclamation district in Hardin County created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 8230.003. FINDINGS OF BENEFIT AND PUBLIC PURPOSE. (a) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) All land and other property included in the boundaries of the district will benefit from the works and projects accomplished by the district under the powers conferred by Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

(c) The creation of the district is essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 8230.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. (a) The district is composed of the territory described by Section 2, Chapter 388, Acts of the 63rd Legislature, Regular Session, 1973, as that territory may have been modified under:

(1) Subchapter H, Chapter 54, Water Code;

(2) Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code; or

(3) other law.

(b) The boundaries and field notes of the district form a closure. A mistake in copying the field notes in the legislative process or another mistake in the field notes does not affect:

(1) the district's organization, existence, or validity;

(2) the district's right to issue any type of bond for a purpose for which the district is created or to pay the principal of and interest on the bond;

(3) the district's right to impose a tax; or

(4) the legality or operation of the district or its governing body.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 8230.005. CERTAIN LAWS INAPPLICABLE TO CREATION OF DISTRICT. The district was created notwithstanding any provision of Section 212.003, Local Government Code, Chapter 42 or 43, Local Government Code, or Section 54.016, Water Code, and to the extent of the creation of the district only, those provisions shall have no application.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 8230.051. COMPOSITION OF BOARD. The board of directors is composed of five elected directors.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8230.101. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT POWERS. The district has the rights, powers, privileges, and functions conferred and imposed by general law applicable to a municipal utility district created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, including Chapters 49 and 54, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2011.